Arkansas, session 2025, SB512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-12-102(a), concerning the offense of
robbery, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person commits robbery if, with the purpose of committing a
felony or misdemeanor theft or resisting apprehension immediately after
committing a felony or misdemeanor theft, the person employs or threatens to
immediately employ physical force, or creates a circumstance that would cause
a reasonable person to believe the use of physical force is imminent, upon
another person.










*ANS325*
03/18/2025 4:19:45 PM ANS325